Hawaii statutes.
§431:5-102 Impairment of surplus.

(a) (1) A domestic mutual insurer's surplus shall be
deemed to be impaired if its qualified assets are less than its liabilities,
plus the amount of any surplus required by this code for the classes of
insurance authorized to be transacted.

(2) If a domestic mutual insurer's surplus is deemed
to be impaired, the commissioner shall at once ascertain the amount of the
deficiency and serve notice upon the insurer to cure the deficiency within
ninety days after service of such notice.

(b) The insurer shall cure the deficiency in
cash or in assets eligible under this code for the investment of the insurer's
funds.

(c) If the deficiency is not cured and proof
thereof filed with the commissioner within such ninety-day period, the insurer
shall be deemed insolvent and shall be proceeded against as authorized by
article 15.

(d) If the deficiency is not cured the insurer
shall not issue or deliver any policy after the expiration of such ninety-day
period. Any officer or director who violates or knowingly permits the
violation of this provision shall be fined not less than $500 nor more than
$10,000 for each violation. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next